North Dakota, session 69, SB2374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-02-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-02-05. Unauthorized insurance prohibited - Exceptions.
An insurance company may not transact insurance business in this state, as set forth in section
26.1-02-06, without a certificate of authority from the commissioner. This section does not apply to:
1. The lawful transaction of surplus lines insurance.
2. The lawful transaction of reinsurance by insurers.
3. Transactions involving a policy lawfully solicited, written, and delivered outside of this state
covering only subjects of insurance not resident, located, or expressly to be performed in this
state at the time of issuance, and which transactions are subsequent to the issuance of such
policy.
4. Transactions involving life insurance, health insurance, or annuities provided to educational or
religious or charitable institutions organized and operated without profit to any private
shareholder or individual, for the benefit of the institutions and individuals engaged in the
service of the institutions.
5. Attorneys acting in the ordinary relation of attorney and client in the adjustment of claims or
losses.
6. Transactions involving group life, accident, and health, or blanket accident and health
insurance, or group annuities if the master policy of the group was lawfully issued and
delivered in and pursuant to the laws of a state in which the insurance company was
authorized to do an insurance business, to a group organized for purposes other than the
procurement of insurance, and where the policyholder is domiciled or otherwise has a bona
fide situs.
7. Transactions involving any insurance policy or annuity contract issued before July 1, 1973.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 2
8. Transactions relative to a policy issued or to be issued outside this state involving insurance
on vessels, craft or hulls, cargoes, marine builder's risk, marine protection and indemnity or
other risk, including strikes and war risks commonly insured under ocean or wet marine forms
of policy.
9. Transactions involving insurance contracts issued to one or more industrial insureds;
provided, that this does not relieve an industrial insured from taxation imposed upon
independently procured insurance. An industrial insured is an insured:
a. Which procures the insurance of any risk or risks other than life and annuity contracts by
use of the services of a full-time employee acting as an insurance manager or buyer or
the services of a regularly and continuously retained qualified insurance consultant;
b. Whose aggregate annual premiums for insurance on all risks total at least twenty-five
thousand dollars; and
c. Which has at least twenty-five full-time employees.
10. Transactions involving insurance contracts covering a large commercial risk as defined in
section 26.1 - 25 - 02.1, provided an industrial insured is not relieved from taxation imposed
upon independently procured insurance.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-25-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-25-02.1. Definitions.
1. "Advisory organization" means any entity, including its affiliates or subsidiaries, which either
has two or more member insurers or is controlled either directly or indirectly by two or more
insurers, and which assists insurers in ratemaking-related activities as enumerated in this
chapter. Two or more insurers having a common ownership or operating in this state under
common management or control constitute a single insurer for purposes of this definition.
2. "Commercial risk" means any kind of risk which is not a personal risk.
3. "Competitive market" means a commercial risk market that has not been found to be
noncompetitive as provided for in section 26.1-25-04. All commercial risk markets except crop
hail, farmowners, and medical malpractice insurance are presumed to be competitive.
4. "Developed losses" means losses including loss adjustment expenses, adjusted, using
standard actuarial techniques, to eliminate the effect of differences between current payment
or reserve estimates and those needed to provide actual ultimate loss including loss
adjustment expense payments.
5. "Expenses" means that portion of a rate attributable to acquisition, field supervision, collection
expenses, general expenses, taxes, licenses, and fees.
6. "Joint underwriting" means a voluntary arrangement established to provide insurance
coverage for a commercial risk pursuant to which two or more insurers jointly contract with the
insured at a price and under policy terms agreed upon between the insurers.
7. "Large commercial risk" means an insured that has:
a. Total insured property values of twenty - five million dollars or more ;
b. Total annual gross revenue of fifty million dollars or more; or

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 3
c. A total premium of one hundred thousand dollars or more for property insurance ,
one hundred thousand dollars or more for general liability insurance, or two hundred
thousand dollars or more for multiperil insurance.
d. The term does not include farming or ranching.
8. "Loss trending" means any procedure for projecting developed losses to the average date of
loss for the period during which the policies are to be effective.
8.9. "Noncompetitive market" means the crop hail, farmowners, and medical malpractice insurance
markets together with any other line of commercial risk insurance that has not been found by
the commissioner to have a reasonable degree of competitiveness within the market
considering:
a. Market concentration and changes in market concentration determined through the use
of the Herfindahl-Hirschman index and the United States department of justice merger
guidelines for an unconcentrated market;
b. The existence of financial and other barriers that prevent a company from entering the
market;
c. The number of insurers or groups of affiliated insurers providing coverage in the market;
d. The extent to which any insurer or group of affiliated insurers controls the market;
e. Whether the total number of companies writing the line of insurance in this state is
sufficient to provide multiple insurance options in the market;
f. The availability of insurance coverage to consumers in the markets by specific
geographic area, by line of insurance, and by class of risk; and
g. The opportunities available in the market to acquire pricing and other consumer
information.
A determination that a market is noncompetitive may not be based solely on the consideration
of any one factor.
9.10. "Personal risk" means homeowners, tenants, private passenger nonfleet automobiles, mobile
homes, and other property and casualty insurance for personal, family, or household needs.
10.11. "Pool" means a voluntary arrangement, established on an ongoing basis, pursuant to which
two or more insurers participate in the sharing of risks on a predetermined basis. The pool
may operate through an association, syndicate, or other pooling agreement.
11.12. "Prospective loss costs" means that portion of a rate that does not include provisions for
expenses other than loss adjustment expenses, or profit, and are based on historical
aggregate losses and loss adjustment expenses adjusted through development to their
ultimate value and projected through trending to a future point in time.
12.13. "Rate" means that cost of insurance per exposure unit whether expressed as a single member
or as a prospective loss cost with an adjustment to account for the treatment of expenses,
profit, and individual insurer variation in loss experience, prior to any application of individual
risk variations based on loss or expense considerations, and does not include minimum
premium.
13.14. "Residual market mechanism" means an arrangement, either voluntary or mandated by law,
involving participation by insurers in the equitable apportionment among them of insurance
which may be afforded applicants who are unable to obtain insurance through ordinary
methods.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 4
14.15. "Supplementary rating information" includes any manual or plan of rates, classification, rating
schedule, minimum premium, policy fee, rating rule, underwriting rule, statistical plan, and any
other similar information needed to determine the applicable rate in effect or to be in effect.
15.16. "Supporting information" means:
a. The experience and judgment of the filer and the experience or date of other insurers or
advisory organizations relied upon by the filer;
b. The interpretation of any other data relied upon by the filer; and
c. Descriptions of methods used in making the rates and any other information required by
the commissioner to be filed.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-25-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-25-16. Rebates prohibited - Exception.
1. No insurance producerAn insurance producer may not knowingly charge, demand, or receive
a premium for any insurance policy except in accordance with this chapter. No insurer or
employee of an insurer, and no insurance producer, broker or agent may pay, allow, or give, or
offer to pay, allow, or give, directly or indirectly, as an inducement to insurance, or after
insurance has been effected, any rebate, discount, abatement, credit, or reduction of the
premium named in an insurance policy, or any special favor or advantage in the dividends or
other benefits to accrue on the policy, or any valuable consideration or inducement whatever,
not specified in the insurance policy, except to the extent provided for in applicable filing. No
insured named in an insurance policy, nor any employee of the insured, may knowingly
receive or accept, directly or indirectly, any such rebate, discount, abatement, credit, or
reduction of premium, or any such special favor or advantage or valuable consideration or
inducement. This section does not prohibit the payment of commissions or other
compensation to licensed insurance producers, nor any insurer from allowing or returning to
its participating policyholders, members, or subscribers dividends, savings, or unabsorbed
premium deposits. As used in this section, "insurance" includes suretyship and "policy"
includes bond and federal crop insurance.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, if the cost does not exceed an aggregate
retail value of one hundred dollars per person per year, an insurance producer may give a gift,
prize, promotional article, logo merchandise, meal, or entertainment activity directly or
indirectly to a person in connection with marketing, promoting, or advertising the business. As
used in this subsection, "person" means the named insured, policy owner, or prospective
client or the spouse of any of these individuals, but the term does not include a certificate
holder, child, or employee of the named insured, policy owner, or prospective client. Subject to
the limits of this subsection, an insurance producer may give a gift card for specific
merchandise or services such as a meal, gasoline, or car wash but may not give cash, a cash
card, any form of currency, or any refund or discount in premium. An insurance producer may
not condition the giving of a gift, prize, promotional article, logo merchandise, meal, or
entertainment activity on obtaining a quote or a contract of insurance. Notwithstanding the
limitation in this subsection, an insurance producer may conduct raffles or drawings, if there is
no financial cost to an entrant to participate, the drawing or raffle does not obligate a
participant to purchase insurance, the prizes are not valued in excess of a reasonable amount
determined by the commissioner, and the drawing or raffle is open to the public. The raffle or
drawing must be offered in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory and may not be
contingent on the purchase, continued purchase, or renewal of a policy. Notwithstanding the
limitation in this subsection, an insurance producer may make a donation to a nonprofit
organization that is exempt from federal taxation under Internal Revenue Code section 501(c)

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 5
(3) [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)] in any amount as long as the donation is not given as an inducement
to obtain a contract of insurance.
3. The provisions in this section may not be construed as including within the definition of
discrimination or rebates any of the following practices:
a. The offer or provision by an insurer or producer, by or through an employee, an affiliate,
or a third-party representative, of value-added products or services at no or reduced cost
if the products or services are not specified in the policy of insurance if the product or
service:
(1) Relates to the insurance coverage and is designed to satisfy one or more of the
following:
(a) Provide loss mitigation or loss control;
(b) Reduce claims costs or claim settlement costs;
(c) Provide education about liability risk or risk of loss to persons or property;
(d) Monitor or assess risk, identify sources of risk, or develop strategies for
eliminating or reducing risk;
(e) Enhance health;
(f) Enhance financial wellness through items such as education of financial
planning services;
(g) Provide post-loss services;
(h) Incent behavioral changes to improve the health or reduce the risk of death or
disability of an individual defined as policyholder, potential policyholder,
certificate holder, potential certificate holder, insured, potential insured, or
applicant; or
(i) Assist in the administration of the employee or retiree benefit insurance
coverage.
(2) If offered by the insurer or producer, the insurer or producer, upon request, shall
ensure the person is provided with contact information to assist the person with
questions regarding the product or service.
(3) Is based on fair documented criteria and offered in a manner not unfairly
discriminatory. The documented criteria must be maintained by the insurer or
producer and produced at the request of the commissioner.
(4) Is reasonable in comparison to that person's premiums or insurance coverage for
the policy class.
b. If an insurer or producer does not have sufficient evidence, but has a good-faith belief the
product or service meets the criteria in subdivision a, the provision by the insurer or
producer of a product or service in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory as part of
a pilot or testing program no longer than one year. An insurer or producer shall notify the
department of the pilot or testing program offered to consumers in this state before
launching and may proceed with the program unless the department objects within
twenty-one days of notice.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 6
4. An insurer, producer, or representative of an insurer or producer may not offer or provide
insurance as an inducement to the purchase of another policy or otherwise use of the words
"free" or "no cost" or words of similar import in an advertisement.
5. The commissioner may adopt regulations when implementing the permitted practices set forth
in this regulation to ensure consumer protection. Consistent with applicable law, the topics
addressed by the regulations may include consumer data protections and privacy, consumer
disclosure, and unfair discrimination.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26-04.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-26-04.1. Fees for services - Rules.
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an insurance producer may charge a fee for
any services rendered in connection with the sale, solicitation, negotiation, placement, or
servicing of an insurance contract, if the following conditions are met:
a. The fees may not be charged on a personal lines account, such as personal
homeowners and automobile, personal life, and health insurance.
b. Before rendering the services and accepting any payment, a written disclosure must be
provided to the party to be charged on a form approved by the commissioner disclosing:
(1) The nature of the services for which the fees will be charged along with a separate
itemization of the amount of the fees;
(2) That the fees are charged in addition to any premiums paid;
(3) That if the insurance producer is also an appointed agent of an insurer with which
coverage is being considered for placement, a statement that the insurance
producer also represents the insurer in the transaction and owes a duty of loyalty to
the insurer; and
(4) That if the insurance producer is to receive a commission from the sale of an
insurance policy related to the services rendered, a statement clearly and
completely disclosing that the:
(a) Insurance producer will receive a commission from the insurer which is paid
from the premiums owed for the insurance; and
(b) Amount of commission received by the insurance producer may differ
depending on the product sold and the insurer.
c. The disclosure required by this section must be signed and dated by both the producer
and the party to be charged.
d. The producer shall retain the signed disclosure required by this section for not less than
five years following the completion of the service. A copy of the signed disclosure must
be available to the commissioner for inspection upon request.
e. The insurance producer may not pay or return, or offer to pay or return, all or part of a fee
charged as an inducement to purchase a specific policy, or coverage within a policy, or
coverage from a particular insurer.
f. Any fee charged under this section must bear a reasonable relationship to the services
provided and may not be discriminatory.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 7
2. An insurance producer charging a fee for services rendered for risk management services
under this section owes the person to be charged a higher standard of care than the ordinary
standard of care otherwise owed by an insurance producer to fully advise the party to be
charged as to the party's insurance needs, including the duty to inform the person to be
charged as to a potential source of risk and to recommend, if available, insurance coverage
for that risk.
3. An insurance producer may charge an individual, for personal or commercial lines, a fee for
paying agency-billed premiums and fees by credit card or other electronic means, if the fee is
disclosed to the client in writing and agreed to by the client in writing.
4. Subdivisions b through d of subsection 1 do not apply to a large commercial risk as defined in
section 26.1 - 25 - 02.1 .
5. The commissioner may adopt rules determined necessary by the commissioner for the
administration of this section.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 26.1-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Mandatory arbitration endorsements for property insurance - Written acceptance - Penalty.
1. A property insurance policy may be issued or delivered in this state with mandatory binding
arbitration provisions if the:
a. Mandatory binding arbitration provisions are contained in a separate endorsement;
b. Named insured accepts the mandatory binding arbitration endorsement in writing in
accordance with subsection 2; and
c. Property insurance policy does not require mandatory binding arbitration upon request.
2. The written acceptance of the insured required under subsection 1 must :
a. Be on a form separate from the policy application and other policy forms;
b. Clearly state the rights being waived in exchange for the premium discount, including the
right to a trial by jury; and
c. Include the following statement in at least twelve-point bold font:
"By signing this form, I agree to resolve all covered property insurance claims through
mandatory binding arbitration. I understand that by agreeing to mandatory binding
arbitration:
I am giving up my right to have disputes resolved in court.
I am giving up my right to a jury trial.
I am accepting these terms in exchange for a premium discount of [dollar amount or
percentage of premium amount].
This agreement is binding on all insureds under the policy and remains effective upon
policy renewal, replacement, or reinstatement unless I request removal of the mandatory
binding arbitration endorsement in writing".
3. All arbitration proceedings under this section must:
a. Be conducted in this state if involving a resident of this state;

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 8
b. Be governed by state law; and
c. Not require arbitration in another state.
4. The acceptance or rejection of mandatory binding arbitration is valid and binding on all
insureds under the policy and remains effective upon policy renewal, replacement, or
reinstatement unless the named insured requests a change in writing.
5. This section applies to all property and casualty insurance policies issued or renewed after the
effective date of this Act.
6. This section does not apply to a:
a. Voluntary arbitration agreement entered after a dispute has arisen;
b. Large commercial risk as defined in section 26.1 - 25 - 02.1; or
c. Commercial surplus line insurance policy placed in accordance with section 26.1 - 44 - 03 .
7. The commissioner shall enforce this section.
8. The commissioner may assess a penalty on an insurer in violation of this section, as
determined by the commissioner.
SECTION 6. A new section to chapter 26.1-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Managed repair programs - Penalty.
1. A property insurance policy may be issued or delivered in this state with a managed repair
program provision offering premium incentives for managed repair program participation. As
used in this section, "managed repair program" means an insurance policy providing a
program with a specified reduction in premium or other specified incentive for participation in a
program restricting an insured's choice of repair vendors or contractors for covered repairs.
2. An insurer offering a managed repair program shall:
a. Prominently disclose on the policy declarations page the policy restricts the insured's
right to choose repair vendors;
b. Specify any premium benefits for program participation;
c. Include a separate disclosure form, written in at least twelve-point font, which explains
the restrictions on vendor selection, including:
(1) The process for repairs under the program;
(2) The insured's rights and responsibilities; and
(3) Any warranty or guarantee provided for repairs.
3. This section does not apply to contractor referral or managed or direct repair programs that do
not provide a specified reduction in premium or other incentive.
4. This section applies to insurance policies issued or renewed after the effective date of this Act.
5. The commissioner shall enforce this section.
6. The commissioner may assess a penalty on an insurer in violation of this section, as
determined by the commissioner.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 9
SECTION 7. A new section to chapter 26.1-39 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Civil remedy actions against property insurers.
Notwithstanding any provision under title 26.1, before a named insured may proceed with a bad
faith claim against a property insurer, the named insured shall establish through an adverse
adjudication by a court of law the property insurer breached the insurance contract and a final judgment
or decree must have been rendered against the insurer.
SECTION 8. A new section to chapter 26.1-39 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Notice of property insurance claim.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Reopened claim" means a claim an insurer closed and reopened upon an insured's
request for additional reimbursement of damage arising out of the original occurrence,
and not previously identified or disclosed to the insurer.
b. "Supplemental claim" means a claim for additional loss or costs from the same
occurrence the insurer previously compensated the insured.
2. A reopened claim under an insurance policy that provides property insurance, including a
policy issued by an eligible surplus lines insurer, for loss or damage is barred unless notice of
the claim was given to the insurer within one year after the date of loss. A supplemental claim
is barred unless notice of the supplemental claim was given to the insurer of the policy within
twelve months after the date of the last payment issued by the insurer for that element of the
loss.
3. The time limitations under subsection 2 are tolled during any term of deployment for a named
insured service member to a combat zone or combat support posting that materially affects
the ability of the named insured to file a claim, supplemental claim, or reopened claim.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-44-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-44-03. Surplus lines insurance.
The placement of nonadmitted insurance is subject to this section only if the insured's home state is
this state. Surplus lines insurance may be placed by a surplus lines producer if:
1. Each insurer is an eligible surplus lines insurer;
2. Each insurer is authorized to write the kind of insurance in its domiciliary jurisdiction;
3. The full amount or type of insurance cannot be obtained from insurers who are admitted to do
business in this state. The full amount or type of insurance may be procured from eligible
surplus lines insurers provided that a diligent search is made amongThe surplus lines
producer is aware that:
a. The full amount and type of insurance is not available from the insurers who are admitted
to transact and are actually writing the particular type of insurance in this state if any are
writing it; or
b. The risk was referred to the surplus lines producer by an insurance producer licensed in
this state.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 10
4. At the time of placement the surplus lines producer has determined that the nonadmitted
insurer:
a. Has established satisfactory evidence of good repute and financial integrity and has
capital and surplus or its equivalent under the laws of its domiciliary jurisdiction which
equals the greater of:
(1) (a) The minimum capital and surplus requirements under the law of this state; or
(b) Fifteen million dollars.
(2) The requirements of paragraph 1 may be satisfied by an insurer possessing less
than the minimum capital and surplus upon an affirmative finding of acceptability by
the commissioner. The finding must be based upon such factors as quality of
management, capital and surplus of any parent company, company underwriting
profit and investment income trends, market availability, and company record and
reputation within the industry. The commissioner may not make an affirmative
finding of acceptability when the nonadmitted insurer's capital and surplus is less
than four million five hundred thousand dollars; or
b. For an insurer not domiciled in the United States or its territories, the insurer is listed on
the quarterly listing of alien insurers maintained by the national association of insurance
commissioners international insurers department; and
5. All other requirements of this chapter are met.
SECTION 10. A new section to chapter 26.1-44 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Surplus lines insurance policies.
A surplus lines insurer may not issue a policy designed to satisfy any law mandating insurance
coverage by a licensed insurance company.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-46-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-46-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
1. "Commissioner" means the North Dakota insurance commissioner or the commissioner,
director, or superintendent of insurance in any other state.
2. "Completed operations liability" means liability arising out of the installation, maintenance, or
repair of any product at a site which is not owned or controlled by any person who performs
that work or any person who hires an independent contractor to perform that work, but
includes liability for activities which are completed or abandoned before the date of the
occurrence giving rise to the liability.
3. "Domicile", for purposes of determining the state in which a purchasing group is domiciled,
means:
a. For a corporation or limited liability company, the state in which the purchasing group is
incorporated or organized.
b. For an entity which is not a corporation or limited liability company, the state of its
principal place of business.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 11
4. "Hazardous financial condition" means that, based on its present or reasonably anticipated
financial condition, a risk retention group, although not yet financially impaired or insolvent, is
unlikely to be able to do either of the following:
a. To meet obligations to policyholders with respect to known claims and reasonably
anticipated claims.
b. To pay other obligations in the normal course of business.
5. "Insurance" means primary insurance, excess insurance, reinsurance, surplus lines insurance,
and any other arrangement for shifting and distributing risk which is determined to be
insurance under the laws of this state.
6. a. "Liability" means legal liability for damages, including costs of defense, legal costs and
fees, and other claims expenses because of injuries to other persons, damage to their
property, or other damage or loss, including contractual claims and expenses, to such
other persons resulting from or arising out of either of the following:
a. (1) Any business whether profit or nonprofit, trade, product, services including
professional services, premises, or operations.
b. (2) Any activity of any state or local government, or any agency or political subdivision
thereof.
b. The term does not include personal risk liability and an employer's liability with respect to
its employees other than legal liability under the federal Employer's Liability Act
[45 U.S.C. 51 et seq.].
7. "Personal risk liability" means liability for damages because of injury to any person, damage to
property, or other loss or damage resulting from any personal, familial, or household
responsibilities or activities, rather than from responsibilities or activities referred to in
subsection 56.
8. "Plan of operation or a feasibility study" means an analysis which presents the expected
activities and results of a risk retention group, including, at a minimum, all of the following:
a. For each state in which it intends to operate, the coverages, deductibles, coverage limits,
rates, and rating classification systems for each line of insurance the group intends to
offer.
b. Historical and expected loss experience of the proposed members and national
experience of similar exposures to the extent that this experience is reasonably available.
c. Pro forma financial statements and projections.
d. Appropriate opinions by a qualified independent casualty actuary, including a
determination of minimum premium or participation levels required to commence
operations and to prevent a hazardous financial condition.
e. Identification of management, underwriting and claims procedures, marketing methods,
managerial oversight methods, reinsurance agreements, and investment policies.
f. Such other matters as may be prescribed by the commissioner for liability insurance
companies authorized by the insurance laws of the state in which the risk retention group
is chartered.
g. Information sufficient to verify that its members are engaged in businesses or activities
similar or related with respect to the liability to which such members are exposed by

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 12
virtue of any related, similar, or common business, trade, product, services, premises, or
operations.
h. Identification of each state in which the risk retention group has obtained, or sought to
obtain, a charter and license, and a description of its status in each such state.
9. "Product liability" means liability for damages because of any personal injury, death, emotional
harm, consequential economic damage, or property damage, including damages resulting
from the loss of use of property, arising out of the manufacture, design, importation,
distribution, packaging, labeling, lease, or sale of a product, but does not include the liability of
any person for those damages if the product involved was in the possession of such a person
when the incident giving rise to the claim occurred.
10. "Purchasing group" means any group which meets all of the following:
a. The group has as one of its purposes the purchase of liability insurance on a group
basis.
b. The group purchases such insurance only for its group members and only to cover their
similar or related liability exposure, as described in subdivision c.
c. The group is composed of members whose business or activities are similar or related
with respect to the liability to which members are exposed by virtue of any related,
similar, or common business, trade, product, services, premises, or operations.
d. The group is domiciled in any state.
11. "Risk retention group" means any corporation or other limited liability association:
a. Whose primary activity consists of assuming and spreading all, or any portion, of the
liability exposure of its group members.
b. Which is organized for the primary purpose of conducting the activity described under
subdivision a.
c. Which is chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company and authorized to
engage in the business of insurance under the laws of any state; or, before January 1,
1985, was chartered or licensed and authorized to engage in the business of insurance
under the laws of Bermuda or the Cayman Islands and, before such date, had certified to
the insurance commissioner of at least one state that it satisfied the capitalization
requirements of such state, except that any such group shall be considered to be a risk
retention group only if it has been engaged in business continuously since that date and
only for the purpose of continuing to provide insurance to cover product liability or
completed operations liability as such terms were defined in the Product Liability Risk
Retention Act of 1981 before the date of the enactment of the Liability Risk Retention Act
of 1986.
d. Which does not exclude any person from membership in the group solely to provide for
members of such a group a competitive advantage over such a person.
e. Which has as its owners only persons who comprise the membership of the risk retention
group and who are provided insurance by such group, or has as its sole owner an
organization which has as its members only persons who comprise the membership of
the risk retention group and its owners only persons who comprise the membership of
the risk retention group and who are provided insurance by such group.
f. Whose members are engaged in businesses or activities similar or related with respect to
the liability of which such members are exposed by virtue of any related, similar, or
common business trade, product, services, premises, or operations.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 13
g. Whose activities do not include the provision of insurance other than:
(1) Liability insurance for assuming and spreading all or any portion of the liability of its
group members.
(2) Reinsurance with respect to the liability of any other risk retention group or any
members of such other group which is engaged in business or activities so that the
group or member meets the requirement described in subdivision f from
membership in the risk retention group which provides such reinsurance.
h. The name of which includes the phrase "risk retention group".
12. "State" means any state of the United States or the District of Columbia.
SECTION 12. A new subsection to section 26.1-46-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
A risk retention group that is not chartered in this state but is in compliance with this section is
deemed an authorized insurer for the satisfaction of any requirement, under the laws of this
state, that insurance coverage be placed with an authorized insurer.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-46-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-46-08. Restrictions on insurance purchased by purchasing groups.
1. A purchasing group may not purchase insurance from a risk retention group that is not
chartered in a state or from an insurer not admitted in the state in which the purchasing group
is located, unless the purchase is effected through a licensed insurance producer acting
pursuant to the surplus lines laws and regulations of such state.
2. A purchasing group which obtains liability insurance from an insurer not admitted in this state
or a risk retention group shall inform each of the members of the group which have a risk
resident or located in this state that the risk is not protected by an insurance insolvency
guaranty fund in this state, and that the risk retention group or insurer may not be subject to all
insurance laws and rules of this state.
3. NoA purchasing group may not purchase insurance providing for a deductible or self-insured
retention applicable to the group as a whole; however, coverage may provide for a deductible
or self-insured retention applicable to individual members unless the purchasing group uses a
policyholder's disclosure statement approved by the commissioner which clearly explains in
simplified language the policy is subject to a group deductible or self-insured retention and
provides a detailed explanation of the process of the satisfaction of the deductible or self-
insured retention among members.
4. Purchases of insurance by purchasing groups are subject to the same standards regarding
aggregate limits which are applicable to all purchases of group insurance.A purchasing group
may not purchase insurance providing for a shared aggregate limit applicable to the group as
a whole unless the purchasing group uses a policyholder's disclosure statement approved by
the commissioner which clearly explains in simplified language the policy is subject to a group
aggregate limit and coverage for each individual member could be exhausted by claims from
other members. The insurance must allow for an individual member to purchase additional
limits in the event of exhaustion and this option must be described in the disclosure statement.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-46-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 14
26.1-46-08.1. Purchasing group taxation - Fees.
1. a. Premium taxes and taxes on premiums paid for coverage of risks resident or located in
this state by a purchasing group or any members of the purchasing group must be:
1. (1) Imposed at the same rate and subject to the same interest, fines, and penalties as
that applicable to premium taxes and taxes on premiums paid for similar coverage
from a similar insurance source by other insureds; and
2. (2) Paid first by suchthe insurance source, and if not by suchthe source, by the
insurance producer for the purchasing group, and if not by suchthe insurance
producer, then by the purchasing group, and if not by such purchasing group, then
by each of its members.
b. To the extent any administrative fee is charged under subsection 2, the fee may not be
considered a premium and is not subject to premium tax.
2. A purchasing group's administrator, manager, or other related party may charge reasonable
fees provided the fees are:
a. For reimbursement of expenses incurred by the administrator, manager, or other related
party in performing its administrative duties for the purchasing group; and
b. Disclosed to all members of the risk purchasing group on a form approved by the
commissioner which states the nature of the administrative duties for which the fees will
be charged along with separate itemization of the amount of fees to be paid by each
member.
SECTION 15. REPEAL. Section 26.1-44-03.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 16. INSURANCE COMMISSIONER STUDY - TOWING AND RECOVERY COVERAGE
FOR VEHICLES WITH LIABILITY-ONLY INSURANCE - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the insurance commissioner may study the feasibility, benefits,
and challenges of providing towing and recovery costs associated with vehicle liability-only
insurance for towing operations. The study must be conducted with stakeholders from both the
insurance industry and the towing industry. The study must include:
a. An evaluation of the frequency and financial impact of the towing and recovery costs of
vehicles without applicable insurance coverage.
b. A review of the cost structures, fee practices, and reimbursement models associated with
standard towing and recovery operations across this state.
c. Consideration of the financial and operational implications of expanding coverage to
include towing and recovery cost coverage for the at-fault vehicle with only liability
coverage.
d. An analysis of the regulatory, administrative, and consumer impacts resulting from the
coverage expansion, including anticipated efficiencies or burdens.
e. A review of approaches taken by other states regarding similar coverage options,
including statutory or regulatory frameworks, and how those states balance the needs of
insurers, towing providers, and consumers.
f. An analysis of insurance protocols and preferred procedures regarding towing
operations. For the purpose of establishing agreements and contracts between insurance
companies and towing companies, preventing misunderstandings, and ensuring a
seamless claims process.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 15
2. Before September 1, 2026, the insurance commissioner shall report its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations,
to the legislative management.

S. B. NO. 2374 - PAGE 16
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2374.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 14 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State